apertium-gag.gag.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>              ! Noun
%<adj%>            ! Adjective 
%<prn%>            ! Pronoun
%<postadv%>        ! Postadverb
%<cop%>            ! Copula
%<np%>             ! Proper noun
%<abbr%>           ! Abbreviation
%<ij%>             ! Interjections 
%<num%>            ! Numeral
%<adv%>            ! Adverb
%<cnjcoo%>         ! Coordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%>
%<cnjadv%>
%<det%>            ! Determiner

! Proper name subcatgories

%<top%>            ! Toponym
%<ant%>            ! Anthroponym
%<cog%>            ! Cognomen


%<ord%>            ! Ordinal

%<sg%>             ! Singular
%<pl%>             ! Plural

! Cases

%<nom%>            ! Nominative
%<gen%>            ! Genitive
%<dat%>            !
%<acc%>            !
%<loc%>            !
%<abl%>            !
%<ins%>            !

! Possession

%<px1sg%>          
%<px2sg%>
%<px3sp%>
%<px1pl%>
%<px2pl%>

! Person agreement

%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

%<m%>              ! Masculine    
%<f%>              ! Feminine     
%<mf%>             ! Both/Either

! "Syntactic" tags. Attributive use of non-adjectives etc. 

%<attr%>           ! Attributive
%<subst%>          ! Substantive
%<advl%>           ! Adverbial

! Pronoun and determiner types ! Виды местоимений

%<pers%>           ! Personal
%<dem%>            ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>            ! Indefinite
%<itg%>            ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>            ! Quantifier
%<neg%>            ! Negative    
%<ref%>            ! Reflexive
%<recip%>          ! Reciprocal

! Verb forms

%<fut%>
%<pres%>
%<ifi%>

%<aor%>
%<nfh%>

%<prog%>           ! Progressive [Loan from Turkish]

%<gna_impf%>
%<gna_perf%>
%<gna_when%>
%<gpr_fut%>

! Punctuation

%<sent%>           ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>
%<apos%>
%<rquot%>
%<rpar%>
%<lpar%>
%<cm%>

! Error tags

%<err_orth%>

! Archiphonemes

%{E%}              ! ê e 
%{A%}              ! a e ä
%{I%}              ! i ı ü u

%{y%}              ! i ı ü u 0
%{i%}              ! i ı ü u 0 
%{a%}              ! a e
%{e%}              ! e            ! Surface 'e' with back harmony

%{L%}              ! l n          ! Plural
%{N%}              ! n 0
%{л%}              ! l n          ! Passive

%{D%}              ! d t
%{T%}              ! t d 
%{к%}              ! k g

%{n%}              ! n 0
%{s%}              ! s 0 
%{й%}              ! y

%{k%}              ! k 0
%{h%}              ! h 0
%{в%}              ! 0
%{и%}              ! i 0          ! Epenthetic vowel with consonant clusters

%{ö%}              ! Front rounded
%{o%}              ! Back rounded
%{ь%}              ! Front
%{ъ%}              ! Back


%{☭%}              ! Loan word phonology
%{·%}              ! Block voicing

%>
%+



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Miscellaneous ;
Numerals ;
Nouns ;
Verbs;
ProperNouns ; 
Cognomena ;
Pronouns ; 
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Determiners ; 
Conjunctions ;
Postpositions ;
Abbreviations ;
Interjections ;
Punctuation;
Barbarisms ; ! Use/Circ


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! VERBS
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-PERS-S1
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}m # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}n # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}%z # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z # ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ; 

%<ifi%>:%>%{й%}%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<cond%>:%>%{й%}s%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}m # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}n # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: #; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z # ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-FUT
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%{A%}%>m # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%{A%}%>n # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{e%}%>k # ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%{a%}%>z # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{a%}%>n%{I%}z # ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%{e%}k%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}z # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I}z # ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ;

%<ifi%>:%>%{й%}%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<nfh%>:%>%{й%}m%{I%}ş V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-PERS-POSS
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m #  ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n # ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} #  ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z # ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z #  ;
                         # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-POSS-FUT
%<px1sg%>:%{A%}%>m # ; 
%<px2sg%>:%{A%}%>n # ; 
%<px3sp%>:%{e%}%>k # ; 
%<px1pl%>:%{a%}%>z # ;
%<px2pl%>:%{a%}%>n%{I%}z # ; 
%<px3pl%>:%{e%}k%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ; 


!LEXICON V-TENSE-ABIL
!%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}m%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
!%<abil%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}bil V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-IMPER
! The imperative, "çok yaşa!", "sigara içmeyin!"
%<imp%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}y%{I%}m # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<imp%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<imp%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}l%{I%}m # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}n # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}n%{I%}z # ; ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%>%{L%}%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON GER-N-INFL-COMMON
CASES ;
POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON GER-SUBST
GER-N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r GER-N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-GER
%<ger%>:%>m%{A%}%{k%} GER-SUBST  ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_abst%>:%>%{й%}{I%}ş GER-SUBST ;
%<ger_nfh%>:%>m%{I%}ş GER-SUBST  ;

!%<ger%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} GER-SUBST  ;



LEXICON V-GPR-SUBST
%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L}%{A%}r SUBST ;

LEXICON V-GPR

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}c      V-PERS-POSS-FUT ; 
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} V-PERS-POSS ;

%<gpr_rsub%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}n     V-GPR-SUBST ;
%<gpr_nfh%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-GPR-SUBST ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_past%>:%>m%{A%}%>%{D%}%{I%}k POSSESSIVES ;
%<gpr_aor%>:%>%{A%}r #  ;

LEXICON V-GNA

%<gna_perf%>:%>%{й%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}r%{A%}k # ;
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{A%} # ;

%<gna_when1%>:%>%{й}%{I%}nc%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<gna_when2%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}yn%{A%}n # ;

%<gna_time1%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}kç%{A%} # ;
%<gna_time2%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}kt%{A%}n # ;

%<neg%>%<gna%>:%>m%{A%}d%{A%}%{A%}n # ;

%<gna_cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<gna_while%>:%>k%{A%}n%{A%} # ; ! Err/Orth
%<gna_while%>:%>k%{A%}n # ;
%<aor%>%<gna_cond%>:%>%{A%}rs%{A%} # ;


LEXICON V-NONFINITE

V-GNA ;
V-GPR ;
V-GER ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREG-NEG
%<neg%>%<gpr_aor%>:%>m%{A%}z # ; ! THIS IS NOT FINITE

LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG
! All of the finite tenses that take negative in -mA-
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<nfh%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-PERS-S1 ;
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

                         V-IMPER ;


LEXICON V-COMMON 
                         V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
                         V-NONFINITE ;
                         V-FINITE-IRREG-NEG ;

%<pres%>:%>%{E%}r        V-PERS-AOR ;
%<pres%>:%>%{й%}%{E%}r   V-PERS-AOR ;              ! Err/Orth

%<neg%>%<pres%>:%>m%{A%}%>%{E%}r V-PERS-AOR ; 

%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r         V-PERS-AOR ;
%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r         V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;

%<aor%>:%>%{I%}r         V-PERS-AOR ;              ! Err/Orth
%<aor%>:%>%{I%}r         V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;    ! Err/Orth

%<prog%>:%>%{A%}yor      V-PERS-S2 ; 

%<fut%>:%>%{й%}%{a%}c    V-PERS-FUT ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>m%{A%}%>%{й%}%{a%}c    V-PERS-FUT ;

%<nfh%>:%>m%{I%}ş        V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;

%<neg%>:%>m%{A%}         V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
%<neg%>:%>m%{A%}         V-NONFINITE ;

                         V-IMPER ;

LEXICON V-ABIL

%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}m%{A%} V-COMMON ;
%<abil%>:%>%{й%}%{A%}bil           V-COMMON ;
                                   V-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-DER
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ş      V-ABIL ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{л%}  V-ABIL ;      ! No pass with IV ? 
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r V-ABIL ;      ! Fix this, -t/-DIr !!!! 

                       V-ABIL ; 

LEXICON V-IV 
%<v%>%<iv%>:%{·%} V-DER ; 

LEXICON Verbs
sırala:sırala V-IV ; !
işle:işle V-IV ; ! "работать"
işle:işlä V-IV ; ! "" ! Err/Orth
dur:dur V-IV;
çek:çek V-IV  ;
yaşa:yaşa V-IV ;
çık:çık V-IV ;
çık:çik V-IV ; ! Err/Orth
gir:gir V-IV ;
gel:gel V-IV ;
geç:geç V-IV ;
başla:başla V-IV ;
başla:başle V-IV ; ! Err/Orth
resimne:resim%>%{L%}e V-IV ; ! ""
düz:düz V-IV ; ! ""
yapıl:yapıl V-IV ;
kurul:kurul V-IV ;
açıkla:açikla V-IV ; ! "" ! Err/Orth
evlän:evlän V-IV ;
evlän:evlen V-IV ; ! Err/Orth
ol:ol V-IV ;
ol%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:olur V-PERS-AOR ; ! Err/Orth
dön:dön V-IV ;
yarış:yarış V-IV ;
diiştir:diiştir V-IV ;
var:var V-IV ;
çekile:çekile V-IV ;
katıl:katıl V-IV ;
kutla:kutla V-IV ;
kazan:kazan V-IV ;
kal:kal V-IV ;
kork:kork V-IV ;
yalvar:yalvar V-IV ;
toplan:toplan V-IV ;
yaşar:yaşar V-IV ;
danış:danış V-IV ;
düzül:düzül V-IV ;
yinan:yinan V-IV ;
genoţi:genoţi V-IV ;
bak:bak V-IV ;
uura:uura V-IV ;
dinnen:dinnen V-IV ;
çal:çal V-IV ;
yat:yat V-IV ;
otur:otur V-IV ;
akt:akt V-IV ;
diy:diy V-IV ;
etiş:etiş V-IV ; ! ""
göç:göç V-IV ; ! ""
savaş:savaş V-IV ; ! ""
düş:düş V-IV ; ! ""
fikirle:fikirle V-IV ; ! ""
genellikle:genellikle V-IV ; ! ""
pin:pin V-IV ; ! ""
ense:ense V-IV ; ! ""
açıkla:açıkla V-IV ; ! ""
baaşla:baaşla V-IV ; ! ""
yan:yan V-IV ; ! ""
yufkala:yufkala V-IV ; ! ""
sözleş:sözleş V-IV ; ! ""
gerçekleş:gerçekleş V-IV ; ! "" 
haberleş:haberleş V-IV ; ! ""
birleş:birleş V-IV ; ! ""
yerleş:yerleş V-IV ; ! ""
seslä:seslä V-IV ; ! ""
seslä:sesle V-IV ; ! "" ! Err/Orth
seslän:seslän V-IV ; ! ""
uyu:uyu V-IV ; ! ""
unut:unu%{T%} V-IV ; ! ""
türklen:türklen V-IV ; ! ""
ilerle:ilerle V-IV ; ! ""
çöz:çöz V-IV ; ! ""
aac:aac V-IV ; ! ""
aac:aaç V-IV ;
tanış:tanış V-IV ; ! ""
kurtul:kurtul V-IV  ; ! ""
zvez:zvez V-IV ; ! ""
baar:baar V-IV ; ! ""
buluş:buluş V-IV ; ! ""
buyur:buyur V-IV ; ! ""
ayırıldı:ayırıldı V-IV ; ! ""
bulgurlan:bulgurlan V-IV ; ! ""
dök:dök V-IV ; ! ""
gül:gül  V-IV ; ! ""
inan:inan V-IV ; ! ""
uzan:uzan V-IV ; ! ""
den:den V-IV ; ! ""
sözlän:sözlän V-IV ;
tamamnan:tamamnan V-IV ; ! ""
sus:sus V-IV ;
deyn:deyn V-IV ; ! ""
gez:gez V-IV ; ! ""
gecele:gecele V-IV ; ! ""
öt:öt V-IV ;
ekmeklän:ekmeklän V-IV ; ! ""
tuzekmeklän:tuzekmeklän V-IV ; ! ""
imzaladı:imzala V-IV ; ! ""
in:in V-IV ; ! ""
kay:kay V-IV ; ! ""
kapa:kapa V-IV ; ! ""
şanlan:şanlan V-IV ; ! ""
sanmak:sanmak V-IV ; ! ""
saygıylan:saygıylan V-IV ; ! ""
sımarla:sımarla V-IV ; ! ""
sokan:sokan V-IV ; ! ""
üren:üren V-IV ; ! ""
say:say V-IV ; ! ""
temelleş:temelleş V-IV ;
tipar:tipar V-IV ;
uç:uç V-IV ;
umutlan:umutlan V-IV ;
uzlaş:uzlaş V-IV ;
git:gi%{T%} V-IV ;
üüret:üüre%{T%} V-IV ; 
lafet:lafe%{T%} V-IV ;
tamamna:tamamna V-IV ; ! ""
tamanna:tamanna V-IV ; ! ""
selämne:selämne V-IV ; ! ""
karşla:karşla V-IV ; ! ""
yaklaş:yaklaş V-IV ; ! ""
öpüşlän:öpüşlän V-IV ; ! ""
kötülä:kötülä V-IV ; ! ""
ek:ek V-IV ; ! "сеять"
biç:biç V-IV ; ! "косить"
eri:eri V-IV ; ! "таять" 
koola:koola V-IV ; ! ""
mındarla:mındarla V-IV ; ! ""
karala:karala V-IV ; ! ""
aalaş:aalaş V-IV ; ! ""
annaş:annaş V-IV ; ! ""
güreş:güreş V-IV ; ! ""
karşılaş:karşılaş V-IV ; ! ""
üüsel:üüsel V-IV ; ! ""
kır:kır V-IV ; ! ""
kapla:kapla V-IV ; ! ""
ger:ger V-IV ; ! ""
zeetle:zeetle V-IV ; ! "" 
zeetle:zeetlä V-IV ; ! "" ! Err/Orth
yokol:yokol V-IV ; ! ""
yıkan:yıkan V-IV ; ! ""
uyukla:uyukla V-IV ; ! ""
bozul:bozul V-IV ; ! ""
çök:çök V-IV ; ! ""
davran:davran V-IV ; ! ""
dayan:dayan V-IV ; ! ""
dokun:dokun V-IV ; ! ""
hızlan:hızlan V-IV ; ! ""
ilgilen:ilgilen V-IV ; ! ""
kız:kız V-IV ; ! ""
kon:kon V-IV ; ! ""
parla:parla V-IV ; ! ""
sız:sız V-IV ; ! ""
sokul:sokul V-IV ; ! ""
solu:solu V-IV ; ! ""
soyun:soyun V-IV ; ! ""
utanma:utanma V-IV ; ! ""
uza:uza V-IV ; ! ""
zenginne:zenginne V-IV ; ! ""
zenginneş:zenginneş V-IV ; ! ""
zorla:zorla V-IV ; ! ""
zorlan:zorlan V-IV ; ! ""
zeydelen:zeydelen V-IV ; ! ""
uy:uy V-IV ; ! ""
uyan:uyan V-IV ; ! ""
patla:patla V-IV ; ! ""
düüş:düüş V-IV ; ! ""
uygula:uygula V-IV ; ! ""
kavra:kavra V-IV ; ! ""
kaybel:kaybel V-IV ; ! ""
kayibol:kayibol V-IV ; ! ""
büü:büü V-IV ; ! ""
gii:gii V-IV ; ! "" 
otla:otla V-IV ; ! ""
urumla:urumla V-IV ; ! ""
yayıl:yayıl  V-IV ; ! ""
yayınnan:yayın%>%{L%}an V-IV ; ! ""
gazifikaţiyala:gazifikaţiyala V-IV ; ! ""
kailol:kailol V-IV ; ! ""
